Utah statutes.
59-7-402.   Water's edge combined report.
(1)  Except as provided in Section 59-7-403, if any corporation listed in
Subsection 59-7-101(36)(a) is doing business in Utah, the unitary group shall
file a water's edge combined report.
(2) (a)  A group of corporations that are not otherwise a unitary group may
elect to file a water's edge combined report if each member of the group is:
(i)  doing business in Utah;
(ii)  part of the same affiliated group; and
(iii)  qualified, under Section 1501, Internal Revenue Code, to file a federal
consolidated return.
(b)  Each corporation within the affiliated group that is doing business in
Utah must consent to filing a combined report.  If an affiliated group elects
to file a combined report, each corporation within the affiliated group that
is doing business in Utah must file a combined report.
(c)  Corporations that elect to file a water's edge combined report under this
section may not thereafter elect to file a separate return without the consent
of the commission.
